Utah statutes.
41-1a-1106.   Storage of vehicles, vessels, and outboard motors -- Reports required.

If any vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor has been stored in a public garage, state impound lot, or other storage facility for 10 days and the owner is unknown to the proprietor, on the 11th day of storage the proprietor shall report the presence of the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor to the law enforcement agency in the city or county where the garage, lot, or facility is located.

